District of Columbia statutes.
46-304.01

Petition to establish support order.

(a)

If a support order entitled to recognition under this chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of the District may issue a support order if:

(1)

The individual seeking the order resides in another state; or

(2)

The support enforcement agency seeking the order is located in another state.

(b)

The tribunal may issue a temporary child-support order if the tribunal determines that such an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

(1)

A presumed father of the child;

(2)

Petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

(3)

Identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

(4)

An alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

(5)

Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

(6)

An acknowledged father as provided by §§ 16-909.01 to 16.909.03 and 16-909.05;

(7)

The mother of the child; or

(8)

An individual who has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

(c)

Upon finding, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to § 46-303.05.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 401, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(d), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-344.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in subsec. (c), deleted “(duties and powers of responding tribunal)” following “§ 46-303.05”; and rewrote subsec. (b).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 401 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).